District of Columbia statutes.
29-304.28

Expense of issue.

A corporation may pay the expenses of selling or underwriting its shares, and of organizing or reorganizing the corporation, from the consideration received for shares.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720